Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 15, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Total Appropriation $ 120,402,000 To the Public Facilities Authority new text begin or other named entity new text end for the purposes specified in this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 15, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. First District Association; Wastewater Industrial Pretreatment Facility 5,000,000 new text begin To the commissioner of agriculture new text end for a grant to the First District Association, a dairy cooperative located in the city of Litchfield, to design, engineer, construct, equip, and furnish, a new wastewater industrial pretreatment facility in the city of Litchfield with a processing capacity of up to 1,750,000 gallons per day of high strength wastewater, a biosolids handling process, and renewable gas production. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WASTEWATER INDUSTRIAL PRETREATMENT FACILITY.new text end new text begin $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for a grant to the First District Association, a dairy cooperative located in the city of Litchfield to design, engineer, construct, equip, and furnish a new wastewater industrial pretreatment facility in the city of Litchfield. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 15, subdivision 7, and is for the same purpose. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end